California, session 20252026, AB1972.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 1526 is added to the Water Code, to read:1526. The board shall exempt a water right applicant person who holds a water right permit or license from paying the annual fee pursuant to Section 1063 1066 of Title 23 of the California Code of Regulations for a pond with 20 acre-feet or less of water.